Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 9. Law Enforcement Interstate Mutual Aid

§ 7-3-901.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Law Enforcement Interstate Mutual Aid Act.”

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-902.
Definitions.

When used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

“Law enforcement agency” means a lawfully established federal, state or local public agency that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of penal, traffic, regulatory or criminal laws;

“Law enforcement agency of an adjoining state” includes a law enforcement agency of an adjoining state and any political subdivision of that state;

“Law enforcement employee of an adjoining state” means an employee of a law enforcement agency trained and certified in accordance with the laws of the state or jurisdiction where regularly employed by the United States, an adjoining state or political subdivision;

“Mutual aid agreement” or “an agreement” means an agreement between two (2) or more law enforcement agencies consistent with the purposes of this act;

“Party law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency that is a party to a mutual aid agreement as set forth in this act;

“Wyoming law enforcement agency” includes a sheriff, municipal, college or university police force, Wyoming highway patrol and the division of criminal investigation;

“Wyoming law enforcement employee” has the same meaning as “peace officer” as defined in W.S.

7-2-101

but does not include those officers specified in W.S.

7-2-101

(a)(iv)(K);

“This act” means W.S.

7-3-901

through

7-3-910

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 7-3-903.
Authorization to enter agreement; general content; authority of law enforcement employee.

Any one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of this state may enter into a mutual aid agreement with any one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of an adjoining state or the United States to render assistance in the provision of the law enforcement or emergency services that the requesting party is authorized by law to perform. Except as authorized by W.S. 7-3-904(b), any agreement under this act shall be limited to providing assistance in an emergency or special event as determined by the governor. The governor shall have emergency procedures in place for immediate approval of any mutual aid agreement, which may include oral authorization by the governor, subject to subsequent written agreement as provided by this act. If required by applicable law, the agreement shall be authorized and approved by the governing body of each party to the agreement.

The written agreement shall fully set forth the powers, rights and obligations of the parties to the agreement.

A mutual aid agreement may grant a law enforcement employee or officer of any party law enforcement agency acting within the territorial jurisdiction of any other party law enforcement agency authority to act as if he were a duly appointed and qualified law enforcement employee or officer of the law enforcement agency he is assisting.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1; 2007, ch. 179, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added “Except as authorized by W.S. 7-3-904(b), any,” and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-904.
Detailed content of agreement.

Any written agreement under this act shall specify the following:

Its duration, which shall be not more than four (4) years;

The purpose of the agreement;

The manner of financing the agreement and establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

The method to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;

Provision for administering the agreement, which may include creation of a joint board responsible for such administration;

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the agreement;

The minimum standards for law enforcement employees implementing the provisions of the agreement;

The respective liability of each party to the agreement for the actions of law enforcement employees when acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The minimum insurance, if any, required of each party to the agreement;

The exact chain of command or delegation of authority to be followed by law enforcement employees acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The enforcement authority that the law enforcement employee of each party law enforcement agency may exercise;

Provisions for any specific immunities not listed in W.S.

7-3-910

and for defending law enforcement employees in civil litigation;

Any other necessary and proper matters.

The agreement may include specified emergency or special events for which the parties to the agreement and the governor concur that law enforcement may respond under the mutual aid agreement without the governor’s authorization required under W.S.

7-3-903

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1; 2007, ch. 179, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-905.
Right of state in actions involving agreements.

In any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation of, or liability under, a mutual aid agreement entered into between one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of this state or political subdivisions of this state and one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of an adjoining state or of the United States, the parties to the agreement are the real parties in interest.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 7-3-906.
Agreement not to relieve agency of duties.

No agreement made under this act may relieve any law enforcement agency of this state of any duty imposed upon it by law. Timely performance of such a duty by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by a mutual aid agreement may be offered in satisfaction of the duty.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-907.
Limitation of powers.

Except for the right granted by this act to jointly exercise powers, this act does not authorize any law enforcement agency of this state to exercise any power within this state that it is not otherwise authorized to exercise.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-908.
Submission of agreement to attorney general.

As a condition precedent to a written agreement becoming effective under this act, the agreement shall be submitted to and receive the approval of the attorney general. Except as provided by W.S.

7-3-903

, no agreement shall become effective under this act until signed by the governor.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-909.
Filing of agreement.

Within twenty (20) days after approval by the attorney general, a written agreement made pursuant to this act shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).

§ 7-3-910.
Immunity.

Whenever the employees of a law enforcement agency of an adjoining state are rendering aid pursuant to the request of a Wyoming law enforcement agency under an agreement pursuant to this act, the employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as comparable Wyoming law enforcement employees as provided for in the agreement.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-902(a)(viii).